California, session 20252026, SB1090.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 65852.21 of the Government Code is amended to read:65852.21. (a) Except as provided in subdivision (m), a proposed housing development containing no more than two residential units within a single-family residential zone shall be considered ministerially, without discretionary review or a hearing, if the proposed housing development meets all of the following requirements:(1) The parcel subject to the proposed housing development is located within a city, the boundaries of which include some portion of either an urbanized area or urban cluster, as designated by the United States Census Bureau, or, for unincorporated areas, a legal parcel wholly within the boundaries of an urbanized area or urban cluster, as designated by the United States Census Bureau.(2) The parcel satisfies the requirements specified in subparagraphs (B) to (K), inclusive, of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 65913.4, as that section read on September 16, 2021.(3) Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any local law, the proposed housing development would not require demolition or alteration of any of the following types of housing:(A) Housing that is subject to a recorded covenant, ordinance, or law that restricts rents to levels affordable to persons and families of moderate, low, or very low income.(B) Housing that is subject to any form of rent or price control through a public entity’s valid exercise of its police power.(C) Housing that has been occupied by a tenant in the last three years.(4) The parcel subject to the proposed housing development is not a parcel on which an owner of residential real property has exercised the owner’s rights under Chapter 12.75 (commencing with Section 7060) of Division 7 of Title 1 to withdraw accommodations from rent or lease within 15 years before the date that the development proponent submits an application.(5) The development is not located in either of the following:(A) A contributing structure within a historic district included on the State Historic Resources Inventory, as defined in Section 5020.1 of the Public Resources Code, or historic property or district pursuant to a city or county ordinance.(B) A parcel individually listed as a historical resource included in the State Historic Resources Inventory, as defined in Section 5020.1 of the Public Resources Code, or within a property individually designated or listed as a city or county landmark under a city or county ordinance.(b) (1) Notwithstanding any local law and except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3), a local agency may impose objective zoning standards, objective subdivision standards, and objective design review standards that do not conflict with this section.(2) (A) The local agency shall not impose objective zoning standards, objective subdivision standards, and objective design standards that would have the effect of physically precluding the construction of up to two units or that would physically preclude either of the two units from being at least 800 square feet in floor area.(B) (i) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), no setback shall be required for an existing structure or a structure constructed in the same location and to the same dimensions as an existing structure.(ii) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), in all other circumstances not described in clause (i), a local agency may require a setback of up to four feet from the side and rear lot lines.(3) A local agency shall not impose objective zoning standards, objective subdivision standards, and objective design standards that do not apply uniformly to development within the underlying zone. This subdivision shall not prevent a local agency from adopting or imposing objective zoning standards, objective subdivision standards, and objective design standards on development authorized by this section if those standards are more permissive than applicable standards within the underlying zone.(4) A local agency may adopt objective standards for the purposes of maintaining the historical value of a historic district listed in the California Register of Historical Resources.(c) In addition to any conditions established in accordance with subdivision (b), a local agency may require any of the following conditions when considering an application for two residential units as provided for in this section:(1) Offstreet parking of up to one space per unit, except that a local agency shall not impose parking requirements in either of the following instances:(A) The parcel is located within one-half mile walking distance of either a high-quality transit corridor, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 21155 of the Public Resources Code, or a major transit stop, as defined in Section 21064.3 of the Public Resources Code.(B) There is a car share vehicle located within one block of the parcel.(2) For residential units connected to an onsite wastewater treatment system, a percolation test completed within the last 5 years, or, if the percolation test has been recertified, within the last 10 years.(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a local agency may deny a proposed housing development project if the building official makes a written finding, based upon a preponderance of the evidence, that the proposed housing development project would have a specific, adverse impact, as defined and determined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 65589.5, upon public health and safety for which there is no feasible method to satisfactorily mitigate or avoid the specific, adverse impact.(e) A local agency shall require that a rental of any unit created pursuant to this section be for a term longer than 30 days.(f) Notwithstanding Article 2 (commencing with Section 66314) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 66333) of Chapter 13, a local agency shall not be required to permit an accessory dwelling unit or a junior accessory dwelling unit on parcels that use both the authority contained within this section and the authority contained in Section 66411.7.(g) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), an application shall not be rejected solely because it proposes adjacent or connected structures provided that the structures meet building code safety standards and are sufficient to allow separate conveyance.(h) (1) An application for a proposed housing development pursuant to this section shall be considered and approved or denied within 60 days from the date the local agency receives a completed application. If the local agency has not approved or denied the completed application within 60 days, the application shall be deemed approved.(2) If a permitting agency denies an application for a proposed housing development pursuant to paragraph (1), the permitting agency shall, within the time period described in paragraph (1), return in writing a full set of comments to the applicant with a list of items that are defective or deficient and a description of how the application can be remedied by the applicant.(i) Local agencies shall include units constructed pursuant to this section in the annual housing element report as required by subparagraph (I) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 65400.(j) For purposes of this section, all of the following apply:(1) A housing development contains two residential units if the development proposes no more than two new units or if it proposes to add one new unit to one existing unit.(2) The terms “objective zoning standards,” “objective subdivision standards,” and “objective design review standards” mean standards that involve no personal or subjective judgment by a public official and are uniformly verifiable by reference to an external and uniform benchmark or criterion available and knowable by both the development applicant or proponent and the public official prior to submittal. These standards may be embodied in alternative objective land use specifications adopted by a local agency, and may include, but are not limited to, housing overlay zones, specific plans, inclusionary zoning ordinances, and density bonus ordinances.(3) “Local agency” means a city, county, or city and county, whether general law or chartered.(k) A local agency may adopt an ordinance to implement the provisions of this section. An ordinance adopted to implement this section shall not be considered a project under Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code.(l) Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede or in any way alter or lessen the effect or application of the California Coastal Act of 1976 (Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000) of the Public Resources Code), except that the local agency shall not be required to hold public hearings for coastal development permit applications for a housing development pursuant to this section.(m) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), this section shall not apply to a proposed housing development located in ZIP Code 91001 or 91003 if the application is submitted on or after January 1, 2025, 2027, and before January 7, 2030.(2) This subdivision shall not apply to an application for a proposed housing development for which the property rights have vested. either of the following:(A) A proposed housing development for which a preliminary application was submitted pursuant to Section 65941.1 prior to January 1, 2027, if the application for a proposed housing development pursuant to this section or an application for a parcel map pursuant to Section 66411.7 is submitted within 180 days of the date of submission of the preliminary application.(B) A proposed housing development that meets all of the following criteria:(i) One hundred percent of the units have an affordable housing cost, as defined in Section 50052.5 of the Health and Safety Code, or an affordable rent, as defined in Section 50053 of the Health and Safety Code.(ii) The units shall be subject to a recorded deed restriction for a period of at least 55 years for rental units and at least 45 years for owner-occupied units.(iii) The development proponent is an entity that is at least one of the following:(I) A community land trust, as defined in clause (ii) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 402.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.(II) A qualified nonprofit corporation, as described in Section 214.15 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.(III) A nonprofit housing sponsor or nonprofit corporation, as described in Section 50091 of the Health and Safety Code, whose primary purpose is the development, ownership, or operation of affordable rental housing.SEC. 2. Section 65852.28 of the Government Code is amended to read:65852.28. (a) Except as provided in subdivision (h), a development proponent may submit an application for a housing development project on a lot that is subdivided pursuant to Section 66499.41 and that meets the requirements of this section.(b) (1) For any housing development on a lot that is subdivided pursuant to Section 66499.41, a local agency may impose objective zoning standards, objective subdivision standards, or objective design standards that are related to the housing development or to the design or improvement of a parcel, and do not conflict with this section or Section 66499.41.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a local agency shall not impose on a housing development on a lot that is subdivided pursuant to Section 66499.41 an objective zoning standard, objective subdivision standard, or objective design standard that does or is any of the following:(A) (i) Physically precludes the development of a project built to densities as specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 65583.2. This paragraph does not preclude a local agency from adopting an ordinance that allows developments at a density greater than the maximum density specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 65583.2.(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), for a development located on a lot that meets the definition of clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 66499.41, a local agency may impose a height limit of no less than the height allowed pursuant to the existing zoning designation applicable to the lot.(B) Imposes any requirement that applies to a project solely or partially on the basis that the subdivision or housing development receives approval pursuant to this section.(C) Requires a setback between the units, except as required in the California Building Code (Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations).(D) Requires that parking be enclosed or covered.(E) Imposes side and rear setbacks from the original lot line inconsistent with subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 65852.21.(F) Imposes parking requirements inconsistent with paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 65852.21.(G) (i) For a housing development project consisting of three to seven units, inclusive, impose a floor area ratio standard that is less than 1.0.(ii) For a housing development project consisting of 8 to 10 units, inclusive, impose a floor area ratio standard that is less than 1.25.(c) (1) A local agency shall ministerially consider, without discretionary review or a hearing, an application submitted to a local agency pursuant to this section.(2) A local agency shall approve or deny an application for a housing development project submitted to a local agency pursuant to this section within 60 days from the date the local agency receives a completed application. If the local agency does not approve or deny a completed application within 60 days, the application shall be deemed approved. If the local agency denies the application, the local agency shall, within 60 days from the date the local agency receives the completed application, return in writing a full set of comments to the applicant with a list of items that are defective or deficient and a description of how the applicant can remedy the application.(d) A local agency may disapprove a housing development project that meets the requirements of this section if it makes a written finding, based upon a preponderance of the evidence, that the proposed housing development project would have a specific, adverse impact, as defined and determined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 65589.5, upon public health and safety and for which there is no feasible method to satisfactorily mitigate or avoid the specific, adverse impact.(e) A local agency may adopt an ordinance to implement the provisions of this section. An ordinance adopted to implement this section shall not be considered a project under Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code.(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.(g) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2025.(h) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), this section shall not apply to a housing development project that is located in ZIP Code 91001 or 91003 if the application is submitted on or after January 1, 2025, 2027, and before January 7, 2030.(2) This subdivision shall not apply to an application for a housing development for which the applicant’s property rights have vested. either of the following:(A) A proposed housing development for which a preliminary application was submitted pursuant to Section 65941.1 prior to January 1, 2027, if the application for a proposed housing development pursuant to this section or an application for a parcel map or tentative and final map pursuant to Section 66499.41 is submitted within 180 days of the date of submission of the preliminary application.(B) A proposed housing development that meets all of the following criteria:(i) One hundred percent of the units have an affordable housing cost, as defined in Section 50052.5 of the Health and Safety Code, or an affordable rent, as defined in Section 50053 of the Health and Safety Code.(ii) The units shall be subject to a recorded deed restriction for a period of at least 55 years for rental units and at least 45 years for owner-occupied units.(iii) The development proponent is an entity that is at least one of the following:(I) A community land trust, as defined in clause (ii) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 402.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.(II) A qualified nonprofit corporation, as described in Section 214.15 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.(III) A nonprofit housing sponsor or nonprofit corporation, as described in Section 50091 of the Health and Safety Code, whose primary purpose is the development, ownership, or operation of affordable rental housing.SEC. 3. Section 66411.7 of the Government Code is amended to read:66411.7. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division and any local law, except as specified in subdivision (p), a local agency shall ministerially approve, as set forth in this section, a parcel map for an urban lot split only if the local agency determines that the parcel map for the urban lot split meets all the following requirements:(1) The parcel map subdivides an existing parcel to create no more than two new parcels of approximately equal lot area provided that one parcel shall not be smaller than 40 percent of the lot area of the original parcel proposed for subdivision.(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), both newly created parcels are no smaller than 1,200 square feet.(B) A local agency may by ordinance adopt a smaller minimum lot size subject to ministerial approval under this subdivision.(3) The parcel being subdivided meets all the following requirements:(A) The parcel is located within a single-family residential zone.(B) The parcel subject to the proposed urban lot split is located within a city, the boundaries of which include some portion of either an urbanized area or urban cluster, as designated by the United States Census Bureau, or, for unincorporated areas, a legal parcel wholly within the boundaries of an urbanized area or urban cluster, as designated by the United States Census Bureau.(C) The parcel satisfies the requirements specified in subparagraphs (B) to (K), inclusive, of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 65913.4, as that section read on September 16, 2021.(D) The proposed urban lot split would not require demolition or alteration of any of the following types of housing:(i) Housing that is subject to a recorded covenant, ordinance, or law that restricts rents to levels affordable to persons and families of moderate, low, or very low income.(ii) Housing that is subject to any form of rent or price control through a public entity’s valid exercise of its police power.(iii) A parcel or parcels on which an owner of residential real property has exercised the owner’s rights under Chapter 12.75 (commencing with Section 7060) of Division 7 of Title 1 to withdraw accommodations from rent or lease within 15 years before the date that the development proponent submits an application.(iv) Housing that has been occupied by a tenant in the last three years.(E) The parcel is not located within a historical landmark property included on the State Historic Resources Inventory, as defined in Section 5020.1 of the Public Resources Code, or within a site that is designated or listed as a city or county landmark pursuant to a city or county ordinance.(F) The proposed urban lot split does not require demolition or alteration of either of the following:(i) A contributing structure located within either a historic district that is included on the California Register of Historical Resources or within a historic district listed or designated pursuant to a city or county ordinance.(ii) An existing exterior structural wall of a structure located within either a historic district that is included on the California Register of Historical Resources or within a historic district listed or designated pursuant to a city or county ordinance.(G) The parcel has not been established through prior exercise of an urban lot split as provided for in this section.(H) Neither the owner of the parcel being subdivided nor any person acting in concert with the owner has previously subdivided an adjacent parcel using an urban lot split as provided for in this section.(b) An application for a parcel map for an urban lot split shall be approved in accordance with the following requirements:(1) (A) A local agency shall approve or deny an application for a parcel map for an urban lot split ministerially without discretionary review.(B) An application for an urban lot split shall be considered and approved or denied within 60 days from the date the local agency receives a completed application. If the local agency has not approved or denied the completed application within 60 days, the application shall be deemed approved.(C) If a permitting agency denies an application for an urban lot split pursuant to subparagraph (B), the permitting agency shall, within the time period described in subparagraph (B), return in writing a full set of comments to the applicant with a list of items that are defective or deficient and a description of how the application can be remedied by the applicant.(2) A local agency shall approve an urban lot split only if it conforms to all applicable objective requirements of the Subdivision Map Act (Division 2 (commencing with Section 66410)), except as otherwise expressly provided in this section.(3) Notwithstanding Section 66411.1, a local agency shall not impose regulations that require dedications of rights-of-way or the construction of offsite improvements for the parcels being created as a condition of issuing a parcel map for an urban lot split pursuant to this section.(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), notwithstanding any local law, a local agency may impose objective zoning standards, objective subdivision standards, and objective design review standards that are related to the design or to improvements of a parcel, consistent with paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) and with subdivision (e), and are applicable to a parcel created by an urban lot split that do not conflict with this section.(2) A local agency shall not impose objective zoning standards, objective subdivision standards, and objective design review standards that would have the effect of physically precluding the construction of two units on either of the resulting parcels or that would result in a unit size of less than 800 square feet.(3) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), no setback shall be required for an existing structure or a structure constructed in the same location and to the same dimensions as an existing structure.(B) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), in all other circumstances not described in subparagraph (A), a local agency may require a setback of up to four feet from the side and rear lot lines.(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a local agency may deny an urban lot split if the building official makes a written finding, based upon a preponderance of the evidence, that the proposed housing development project would have a specific, adverse impact, as defined and determined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 65589.5, upon public health and safety for which there is no feasible method to satisfactorily mitigate or avoid the specific, adverse impact.(e) In addition to any conditions established in accordance with this section, a local agency may require any of the following conditions when considering an application for a parcel map for an urban lot split:(1) Easements required for the provision of public services and facilities.(2) A requirement that the parcels have access to, provide access to, or adjoin the public right-of-way.(3) Offstreet parking of up to one space per unit, except that a local agency shall not impose parking requirements in either of the following instances:(A) The parcel is located within one-half mile walking distance of either a high-quality transit corridor as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 21155 of the Public Resources Code, or a major transit stop as defined in Section 21064.3 of the Public Resources Code.(B) There is a car share vehicle located within one block of the parcel.(f) A local agency shall require that the uses allowed on a lot created by this section be limited to residential uses.(g) (1) A local agency shall require an applicant for an urban lot split to sign an affidavit stating that the applicant intends to occupy one of the housing units as their principal residence for a minimum of three years from the date of the approval of the urban lot split.(2) This subdivision shall not apply to an applicant that is a “community land trust,” as defined in clause (ii) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 402.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or is a “qualified nonprofit corporation” as described in Section 214.15 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.(3) A local agency shall not impose additional owner occupancy standards, other than provided for in this subdivision, on an urban lot split pursuant to this section.(h) A local agency shall require that a rental of any unit created pursuant to this section be for a term longer than 30 days.(i) A local agency shall not require, as a condition for ministerial approval of a parcel map application for the creation of an urban lot split, the correction of nonconforming zoning conditions.(j) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of Section 65852.21, 65915, Article 2 (commencing with Section 66314) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 66333) of Chapter 13 of Division 1, or this section, a local agency shall not be required to permit more than two units on a parcel created through the exercise of the authority contained within this section.(2) For the purposes of this section, “unit” means any dwelling unit, including, but not limited to, a unit or units created pursuant to Section 65852.21, a primary dwelling, an accessory dwelling unit as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 66313, or a junior accessory dwelling unit as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 66313.(k) Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), an application shall not be rejected solely because it proposes adjacent or connected structures provided that the structures meet building code safety standards and are sufficient to allow separate conveyance.(l) Local agencies shall include the number of applications for parcel maps for urban lot splits pursuant to this section in the annual housing element report as required by subparagraph (I) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 65400.(m) For purposes of this section, both of the following shall apply:(1) “Objective zoning standards,” “objective subdivision standards,” and “objective design review standards” mean standards that involve no personal or subjective judgment by a public official and are uniformly verifiable by reference to an external and uniform benchmark or criterion available and knowable by both the development applicant or proponent and the public official prior to submittal. These standards may be embodied in alternative objective land use specifications adopted by a local agency, and may include, but are not limited to, housing overlay zones, specific plans, inclusionary zoning ordinances, and density bonus ordinances.(2) “Local agency” means a city, county, or city and county, whether general law or chartered.(n) A local agency may adopt an ordinance to implement the provisions of this section. An ordinance adopted to implement this section shall not be considered a project under Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code.(o) Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede or in any way alter or lessen the effect or application of the California Coastal Act of 1976 (Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000) of the Public Resources Code), except that the local agency shall not be required to hold public hearings for coastal development permit applications for urban lot splits pursuant to this section.(p) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), this section shall not apply to a parcel map for an urban lot split that is located in ZIP Code 91001 or 91003 if the application is submitted on or after January 1, 2025, 2027, and before January 7, 2030.(2) This subdivision shall not apply to an application for a parcel map for an urban lot split for which the applicant’s property rights have vested. either of the following:(A) A parcel map for an urban lot split for a housing development project for which a preliminary application was submitted pursuant to Section 65941.1 prior to January 1, 2027, if the application for a parcel map pursuant to this section or an application for a housing development pursuant to Section 65852.21 is submitted within 180 days of the date of submission of the preliminary application.(B) A parcel map for a housing development project that meets all of the following criteria:(i) One hundred percent of the units have an affordable housing cost, as defined in Section 50052.5 of the Health and Safety Code, or an affordable rent, as defined in Section 50053 of the Health and Safety Code.(ii) The units shall be subject to a recorded deed restriction for a period of at least 55 years for rental units and at least 45 years for owner-occupied units.(iii) The development proponent is an entity that is at least one of the following:(I) A community land trust, as defined in clause (ii) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 402.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.(II) A qualified nonprofit corporation, as described in Section 214.15 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.(III) A nonprofit housing sponsor or nonprofit corporation, as described in Section 50091 of the Health and Safety Code, whose primary purpose is the development, ownership, or operation of affordable rental housing.SEC. 4. Section 66499.41 of the Government Code is amended to read:66499.41. (a) Except as specified in subdivision (j), a local agency shall ministerially consider, without discretionary review or a hearing, a parcel map or a tentative and final map for a housing development project that meets all of the following requirements:(1) (A) The proposed subdivision will result in 10 or fewer parcels and the housing development project on the lot proposed to be subdivided will contain 10 or fewer residential units, except as provided in subdivision (g).(B) The proposed subdivision may designate a remainder parcel, as defined under Section 66424.6, that retains existing land uses or structures, does not contain any new residential units, and is not exclusively dedicated to serving the housing development project. The remainder parcel shall not be counted against the 10-parcel maximum permitted under subparagraph (A).(2) The lot proposed to be subdivided meets all of the following sets of requirements:(A) The lot is one of the following:(i) Zoned to allow multifamily residential dwelling use.(ii) Vacant and zoned for single-family residential development. For purposes of this paragraph, “vacant” means having no permanent structure, unless the permanent structure is abandoned and uninhabitable. All of the following types of housing shall not be defined as “vacant:”(I) Housing that is subject to a recorded covenant, ordinance, or law that restricts rent or sales price to levels affordable to persons and families of low, very low, or extremely low income.(II) Housing that is subject to any form of rent or sales price control through a local public entity’s valid exercise of its police power.(III) Housing occupied by tenants within the five years preceding the date of the application, including housing that has been demolished or that tenants have vacated prior to the submission of the application for a development permit.(B) (i) A lot zoned to allow multifamily residential dwelling use is no larger than five acres and is substantially surrounded by qualified urban uses.(ii) A vacant lot zoned for single-family residential development is no larger than one and one-half acres and is substantially surrounded by qualified urban uses.(iii) For purposes of this subparagraph, the following definitions apply:(I) “Qualified urban use” has the same meaning as defined in Section 21072 of the Public Resources Code.(II) “Substantially surrounded” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 21159.25 of the Public Resources Code.(C) The lot is a legal parcel located within one of the following:(i) An incorporated city, the boundaries of which include some portion of an urbanized area.(ii) An urbanized area or urban cluster in a county with a population greater than 600,000 based on the most recent United States Census Bureau data.(iii) For purposes of this subparagraph, the following definitions apply:(I) “Urbanized area” means an urbanized area designated by the United States Census Bureau, as published in the Federal Register, Volume 77, Number 59, on March 27, 2012.(II) “Urban cluster” means an urban cluster designated by the United States Census Bureau, as published in the Federal Register, Volume 77, Number 59, on March 27, 2012.(D) The lot was not established pursuant to this section, including a designated remainder parcel described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), or Section 66411.7.(3) (A) Except as specified in subparagraphs (B) and (C), the newly created parcels are no smaller than 600 square feet.(B) If the parcels are zoned for single-family residential use, the newly created parcels are no smaller than 1,200 square feet.(C) A local agency may, by ordinance, adopt a smaller minimum parcel size subject to ministerial approval under this subdivision.(4) The housing units on the lot proposed to be subdivided are one of the following:(A) Constructed on fee simple ownership lots.(B) Part of a common interest development.(C) Part of a housing cooperative, as defined in Section 817 of the Civil Code.(D) Constructed on land owned by a community land trust. For the purpose of this subparagraph, “community land trust” means a nonprofit corporation organized pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that satisfies all of the following:(i) Has as its primary purposes the creation and maintenance of permanently affordable single-family or multifamily residences.(ii) All dwellings and units located on the land owned by the nonprofit corporation are sold to qualified owners to be occupied as the qualified owner’s primary residence or rented to persons and families of low or moderate income. For the purpose of this subparagraph, “qualified owner” means a person or family of low or moderate income, including a person or family of low or moderate income who owns a dwelling or unit collectively as a member occupant or resident shareholder of a limited-equity housing cooperative.(iii) The land owned by the nonprofit corporation, on which a dwelling or unit sold to a qualified owner is situated, is leased by the nonprofit corporation to the qualified owner for the convenient occupation and use of that dwelling or unit for a renewable term of 99 years.(E) Part of a tenancy in common, as described in Section 685 of the Civil Code.(5) The proposed housing development project will, pursuant to the requirements of this division, meet one of the following, as applicable:(A) If the parcel is identified in the jurisdiction’s housing element for the current planning period that is in substantial compliance with Article 10.6 (commencing with Section 65580) of Chapter 3 of Division 1, the housing development project will result in at least as many units as projected for that parcel in the housing element. If the parcel is identified to accommodate any portion of the jurisdiction’s share of the regional housing need for low-income or very low income households, the housing development project will result in at least as many low-income or very low income units as projected in the housing element. These units shall be subject to a recorded affordability restriction of at least 45 years.(B) (i) If the parcel is not identified in the jurisdiction’s housing element for the current planning period that is in substantial compliance with Article 10.6 (commencing with Section 65580) of Chapter 3 of Division 1, the housing development project will result in at least 66 percent of the maximum allowable residential density as specified by local zoning or 66 percent of the applicable residential density specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 65583.2, whichever is greater.(ii) Where local zoning does not specify a maximum allowable residential density, the housing development project will result in at least 66 percent of the applicable residential density as specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 65583.2.(iii) The area of any designated remainder parcel described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) shall be excluded from the calculation of residential density under this paragraph.(6) The average total area of floorspace for the proposed housing units on the lot proposed to be subdivided does not exceed 1,750 net habitable square feet. For purposes of this paragraph, “net habitable square feet” means the finished and heated floor area fully enclosed by the inside surface of walls, windows, doors, and partitions, and having a headroom of at least six and one-half feet, including working, living, eating, cooking, sleeping, stair, hall, service, and storage areas, but excluding garages, carports, parking spaces, cellars, half-stories, and unfinished attics and basements.(7) The housing development project on the lot proposed to be subdivided complies with any local inclusionary housing ordinances adopted by the local agency.(8) The development of a housing development project on the lot proposed to be subdivided does not require the demolition or alteration of any of the following types of housing:(A) Housing that is subject to a recorded covenant, ordinance, or law that restricts rent to levels affordable to persons and families of low, very low, or extremely low income.(B) Housing that is subject to any form of rent or price control through a local public entity’s valid exercise of its police power.(C) Housing occupied by tenants within the five years preceding the date of the application, including housing that has been demolished or that tenants have vacated prior to the submission of the application for a development permit.(D) A parcel on which an owner of residential real property has exercised the owner’s rights under Chapter 12.75 (commencing with Section 7060) of Division 7 of Title 1 to withdraw accommodations from rent or lease within 15 years before the date that the development proponent submits an application.(9) The lot proposed to be subdivided is not located on a site that is any of the following:(A) Either prime farmland or farmland of statewide importance, as defined pursuant to United States Department of Agriculture land inventory and monitoring criteria, as modified for California, and designated on the maps prepared by the Farmland Mapping and Monitoring Program of the Department of Conservation, or land zoned or designated for agricultural protection or preservation by a local ballot measure that was approved by the voters of that jurisdiction.(B) Wetlands, as defined in the United States Fish and Wildlife Service Manual, Part 660 FW 2 (June 21, 1993).(C) Within a very high fire hazard severity zone, as determined by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection pursuant to Section 51178, or within a high or very high fire hazard severity zone as indicated on maps adopted by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection pursuant to Section 4202 of the Public Resources Code.(D) A hazardous waste site that is listed pursuant to Section 65962.5 or a hazardous waste site designated by the Department of Toxic Substances Control pursuant to former Section 25356 of the Health and Safety Code, unless either of the following applies:(i) The site is an underground storage tank site that received a uniform closure letter issued pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 25296.10 of the Health and Safety Code based on closure criteria established by the State Water Resources Control Board for residential use or residential mixed uses. This section does not alter or change the conditions to remove a site from the list of hazardous waste sites listed pursuant to Section 65962.5.(ii) The State Department of Public Health, State Water Resources Control Board, Department of Toxic Substances Control, or a local agency making a determination pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 25296.10 of the Health and Safety Code, has otherwise determined that the site is suitable for residential use or residential mixed uses.(E) Within a delineated earthquake fault zone as determined by the State Geologist in any official maps published by the State Geologist, unless the housing development project complies with applicable seismic protection building code standards adopted by the California Building Standards Commission under the California Building Standards Law (Part 2.5 (commencing with Section 18901) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code), and by any local building department under Chapter 12.2 (commencing with Section 8875) of Division 1 of Title 2.(F) Within a special flood hazard area subject to inundation by the 1-percent annual chance flood (100-year flood) as determined by the Federal Emergency Management Agency in any official maps published by the Federal Emergency Management Agency. If a development proponent is able to satisfy all applicable federal qualifying criteria in order to provide that the site satisfies this paragraph and is otherwise eligible for streamlined approval under this section, a local government shall not deny the application on the basis that the development proponent did not comply with any additional permit requirement, standard, or action adopted by that local government that is applicable to that site. A housing development project may be located on a site described in this subparagraph if either of the following is met:(i) The site has been subject to a Letter of Map Revision prepared by the Federal Emergency Management Agency and issued to the local jurisdiction.(ii) The site meets Federal Emergency Management Agency requirements necessary to meet minimum flood plain management criteria of the National Flood Insurance Program pursuant to Part 59 (commencing with Section 59.1) and Part 60 (commencing with Section 60.1) of Subchapter B of Chapter I of Title 44 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(G) Within a regulatory floodway as determined by the Federal Emergency Management Agency in any official maps published by the Federal Emergency Management Agency, unless the housing development project has received a no-rise certification in accordance with Section 60.3(d)(3) of Title 44 of the Code of Federal Regulations. If a development proponent is able to satisfy all applicable federal qualifying criteria in order to provide that the site satisfies this subparagraph and is otherwise eligible for streamlined approval under this section, a local government shall not deny the application on the basis that the development proponent did not comply with any additional permit requirement, standard, or action adopted by that local government that is applicable to that site.(H) Land identified for conservation in an adopted natural community conservation plan pursuant to the Natural Community Conservation Planning Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code), habitat conservation plan pursuant to the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.), or another adopted natural resource protection plan.(I) Habitat for protected species identified as candidate, sensitive, or species of special status by state or federal agencies, fully protected species, or species protected by the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.), the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code), or the Native Plant Protection Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1900) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code).(J) Land under conservation easement.(10) The proposed subdivision conforms to all applicable objective requirements of the Subdivision Map Act (Division 2 (commencing with Section 66410)), except as otherwise expressly provided in this section.(11) The proposed subdivision complies with all applicable standards established pursuant to Section 65852.28.(12) Any parcels proposed to be created pursuant to this section will be served by a public water system and a municipal sewer system.(13) The proposed subdivision will not result in any existing dwelling unit being alienable separate from the title to any other existing dwelling unit on the lot.(b) A housing development project on a proposed site to be subdivided pursuant to this section is not required to comply with either of the following requirements:(1) A minimum requirement on the size, width, depth, frontage, or dimensions of an individual parcel created by the housing development project beyond the minimum parcel size specified in, or established pursuant to, paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).(2) (A) The formation of a homeowners’ association, except as required by the Davis-Stirling Common Interest Development Act (Part 5 (commencing with Section 4000) of Division 4 of the Civil Code).(B) Subparagraph (A) shall not be construed to prohibit a local agency from requiring a mechanism for the maintenance of common space within the subdivision, including, but not limited to, a road maintenance agreement.(c) A local agency shall approve or deny an application for a parcel map or a tentative map for a housing development project submitted to a local agency pursuant to this section within 60 days from the date the local agency receives a completed application. If the local agency does not approve or deny a completed application within 60 days, the application shall be deemed approved. If the local agency denies the application, the local agency shall, within 60 days from the date the local agency receives the completed application, return in writing a full set of comments to the applicant with a list of items that are defective or deficient and a description of how the applicant can remedy the application.(d) Any housing development project constructed on the lot proposed to be subdivided pursuant to this section shall comply with all applicable objective zoning standards, objective subdivision standards, and objective design standards as established by the local agency that are not inconsistent with this section and paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 65852.28.(e) (1) (A) Except as provided in paragraph (2), no person shall sell, lease, or finance any parcel or parcels of real property resulting from a subdivision under this section separately from any other such parcel or parcels, unless each parcel that is sold, leased, or financed meets one of the following criteria:(i) The parcel contains a residential structure completed in compliance with all applicable provisions of the California Building Standards Code that includes at least one dwelling unit.(ii) The parcel already contains an existing legally permitted residential structure.(iii) The parcel is reserved for internal circulation, open space, or common area.(iv) The parcel is the only remaining parcel within the subdivision that is not developed with a residential structure that was completed in compliance with all applicable provisions of the California Building Standards Code.(B) For purposes of this subdivision, “parcel or parcels of real property resulting from a subdivision under this section” shall not include any designated remainder parcel described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).(C) Violation of this paragraph shall constitute the sale of real property that has been divided in violation of the provisions of this division and shall be subject to the penalties and remedies set forth in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 66499.30).(2) A local agency may, by ordinance or map condition, authorize the sale, lease, or finance of any parcel or parcels of real property resulting from a subdivision under this section without compliance with the provisions of paragraph (1).(f) A local agency may deny the issuance of a parcel map, a tentative map, or a final map if it makes a written finding, based upon a preponderance of the evidence, that the proposed housing development project would have a specific, adverse impact, as defined and determined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 65589.5, upon public health and safety and for which there is no feasible method to satisfactorily mitigate or avoid the specific, adverse impact.(g) Notwithstanding Article 2 (commencing with Section 66314) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 66333) of Chapter 13 of Division 1, a local agency is not required to permit an accessory dwelling unit or a junior accessory dwelling unit on parcels created through the exercise of the authority contained within this section. If a local agency chooses to permit accessory dwelling units or junior accessory dwelling units, the units shall not count as residential units for the purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).(h) (1) Notwithstanding Section 66411.7, a local agency is not required to permit an urban lot split on a parcel created through the exercise of the authority contained within this section.(2) Notwithstanding Sections 65852.21 and 66411.7, those sections shall not apply to a site that meets both of the following requirements:(A) The site is located within a single-family residential horsekeeping zone designated in a master plan, adopted before January 1, 1994, that regulates land zoned single-family horsekeeping, commercial, commercial-recreational, and existing industrial within the plan area.(B) The applicable local government has an adopted housing element that is compliant with applicable law.(i) A local agency may adopt an ordinance to implement the provisions of this section. An ordinance adopted to implement this section shall not be considered a project under Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code.(j) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), and except as specified in paragraph (2), this section shall not apply to a parcel map or a tentative and final map for a housing development project that is located in ZIP Code 91001 or 91003 if the application is submitted on or after January 1, 2025, 2027, and before January 7, 2030.(2) This subdivision shall not apply to an application for a parcel map or a tentative and final map for a housing development for which the applicant’s property rights have vested. either of the following:(A) A parcel map or tentative and final map for a housing development project for which a preliminary application was submitted pursuant to Section 65941.1 prior to January 1, 2027, if the application for a map pursuant to this section or an application for a housing development pursuant to Section 65852.28 is submitted within 180 days of the date of submission of the preliminary application.(B) A parcel map or tentative and final map for a housing development project that meets all of the following criteria:(i) One hundred percent of the units have an affordable housing cost, as defined in Section 50052.5 of the Health and Safety Code, or an affordable rent, as defined in Section 50053 of the Health and Safety Code.(ii) The units shall be subject to a recorded deed restriction for a period of at least 55 years for rental units and at least 45 years for owner-occupied units.(iii) The development proponent is an entity that is at least one of the following:(I) A community land trust, as defined in clause (ii) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 402.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.(II) A qualified nonprofit corporation, as described in Section 214.15 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.(III) A nonprofit housing sponsor or nonprofit corporation, as described in Section 50091 of the Health and Safety Code, whose primary purpose is the development, ownership, or operation of affordable rental housing.SEC. 5. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution in order to address the disparity in protection from predatory development practices following the Los Angeles fires for communities in the unincorporated area known as Altadena in the County of Los Angeles that are excluded from the scope of Executive Order No. N-32-25.